Hawaii statutes.
[§342G-43] Reporting. (a) Each state
agency that conducts its own procurement activities shall annually submit
information and data to the office regarding:

(1) The agency’s progress in developing procurement
programs;

(2) The total amount of paper purchased during the
year; and

(3) The amount of recycled goods purchased during the
year compared to nonrecycled counterparts.

If an agency is unable to supply this information,
the agency shall describe what steps it is taking to obtain this information in
the future.

(b) At the request of the office, each county
shall provide a similar report. [L 1991, c 324, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next